Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5272.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 31-23.3-5 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-23.3 entitled
"Nontransparent Windshields and Windows" is hereby amended to read as follows:
31-23.3-5. Penalties.
(a) Any person, firm, corporation, or other business entity that installs any sunscreening
material which is not in compliance with the provisions of this chapter shall be fined not more than
two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for each offense.
(b) Any person who owns a motor vehicle which has installed on it any sunscreening device
or material in violation of this chapter shall be fined not more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250).
(c) The owner of a rented or leased motor vehicle shall be entitled to establish non-liability
for violations under this section by providing to the traffic tribunal or any municipality which has
jurisdiction over the citation, a copy of a written rental or lease agreement which shall be prima
facie evidence that the lessee was the operator of the vehicle.
(d) The issuing authority shall provide the owner of a rented or leased vehicle a notice, in
writing, of each violation under this section in which a motor vehicle owned by the rental or leasing
company is involved, including the license number of the vehicle and the date and time of the
violation. Upon receipt of this notice, the owner of a rented or leased vehicle shall inform the
issuing authority, within twenty (20) days, to the extent available, the operator's name, home
address, employer, employer's address, and local address, if any.

(e) The renter or lessee shall not be considered an agent of the owner if the owner is
engaged in the business of renting or leasing vehicles.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000888
========
LC000888 - Page 2 of 3